Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4304
Risk management pool; agreements authorized.

(1) Any two or more public agencies may make and execute an agreement providing for joint and cooperative action in accordance with the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act to form, become members of, and operate a risk management pool for the purpose of providing to members risk management services and insurance coverages in the form of group self-insurance or standard insurance, including any combination of group self-insurance and standard insurance, to protect members against losses arising from any of the following:

(a) General liability;

(b) Damage, destruction, or loss of real or personal property, including, but not limited to, loss of use or occupancy, and loss of income or extra expense resulting from loss of use or occupancy;

(c) Errors and omissions liability; and

(d) Workers' compensation liability.

(2) Any two or more public agencies, other than school districts and educational service units, may make and execute an agreement providing for joint and cooperative action in accordance with the act to form, become members of, and operate a risk management pool for the purpose of providing to members risk management services and insurance coverages in the form of group self-insurance or standard insurance, including any combination of group self-insurance and standard insurance, to provide health, dental, accident, and life insurance to member's employees and officers.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 664, § 3.